New Jersey, session 222, S3536.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Upon the death of a member in active service as a result of: (1)  an accident met in the actual performance of duty at some definite time and place, or (2)  service in the reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard in a federal active duty status, and such death was not the result of the members willful negligence, an accidental death benefit shall be payable if a report of the accident is filed in the office of the retirement system within 60 days next following the accident, but the board of trustees may waive such time limit, for a reasonable period, if in the judgment of the board the circumstances warrant such action.  No such application shall be valid or acted upon unless it is filed in the office of the retirement system within five years of the date of such death. The provisions of this section shall apply only to a member who is a firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, hazardous materials emergency first responder, or fire instructor. b. Upon the receipt of proper proofs of the death of a member on account of which an accidental death benefit is payable, there shall be paid to the members widow or widower a pension of 70 percent of the compensation, upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service, or a pension of $50,000, whichever is greater, for the use of herself or himself and the children of the deceased member.  The benefits to the widow or widower shall not be terminated upon remarriage.  If there is no surviving widow or widower or in the case the widow or widower dies, 70 percent of such compensation will be payable to the members surviving child or children in equal shares. If there is no surviving widow, widower, or child, 25 percent of the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service, will be payable to one surviving dependent parent or 40 percent of such compensation will be payable to two surviving parents in equal shares. In the event of accidental death occurring in the first year of creditable service, the benefits, payable pursuant to this subsection, shall be computed at the annual rate of compensation. c.  If there is no surviving widow, widower, child, or dependent parent, there shall be paid to any other beneficiary of the deceased member, the members accumulated deductions at the time of death. d.  In no case shall the death benefit provided in subsection b. be less than that provided under subsection c. of this section. e. In addition to the foregoing benefits payable under subsections b. or c., there shall also be paid in one sum to such beneficiary, if living, as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement system, otherwise to the executor or administrator of the members estate, an amount equal to three and one half times the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service. f.  In addition to the foregoing benefits, the State shall pay to the employer-sponsored health insurance program all health insurance premiums for the coverage of the members surviving widow or widower and dependent children. g.  An accidental death benefit payable under section 49 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-49) granted on or after January 1, 2021, shall be converted to the benefit payable under this section and a payment representing the difference in payments between the benefit granted under section 49 of P.L.1954, c.84 and this section shall be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary from the date the original benefit was granted. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall be retroactive to January 1, 2021.